software/EmEditor/Dictionaries/en_us_ru_ru.aff
SFX 46   еться ятся         [дрт]еться
SFX 46   еться люсь         петься
SFX 46   еться ишься        [дрт]еться
SFX 46   еться ится         [дрт]еться
SFX 46   еться итесь        [дрт]еться
SFX 46   еться имся         [дрт]еться
SFX 46   еться юсь          реться
SFX 46   еть  ят           [дмнпрст]еть
SFX 46   еть  лю           петь
SFX 46   еть  ишь          [дмнпрст]еть
SFX 46   еть  ите          [дмнпрст]еть
SFX 46   еть  ит           [дмнпрст]еть
SFX 46   еть  им           [дмнпрст]еть
SFX 46   еть  ю            реть
SFX 46   есть тут          честь
SFX 46   есть ту           честь
SFX 46   есть тешь         честь
SFX 46   есть тете         честь
SFX 46   есть тет          честь
SFX 46   есть тем          честь
SFX 46   есть тёшь         честь
SFX 46   есть тёте         честь
SFX 46   есть тёт          честь
SFX 46   есть тём          честь
SFX 46   есть ядут         сесть
SFX 46   есть яду          сесть
SFX 46   есть ядешь        сесть
SFX 46   есть ядете        сесть
SFX 46   есть ядет         сесть
SFX 46   есть ядем         сесть
SFX 46   деться жусь         деться
SFX 46   деть жу           деть
SFX 46   аться утся         рваться
SFX 46   аться утся         осаться
SFX 46   аться усь          рваться
SFX 46   аться усь          осаться
SFX 46   аться ятся         спаться
SFX 46   аться люсь         спаться
SFX 46   аться ишься        жаться
SFX 46   аться ишься        спаться
SFX 46   аться ится         жаться
SFX 46   аться ится         спаться
SFX 46   аться итесь        жаться
SFX 46   аться итесь        спаться
SFX 46   аться имся         жаться
SFX 46   аться имся         спаться
SFX 46   аться ешься        рваться
SFX 46   аться ешься        осаться
SFX 46   аться ется         рваться
SFX 46   аться ется         осаться
SFX 46   аться етесь        рваться
SFX 46   аться етесь        осаться
SFX 46   аться емся         рваться
SFX 46   аться емся         осаться
SFX 46   аться ёшься        рваться
SFX 46   аться ёшься        осаться
SFX 46   аться ётся         рваться
SFX 46   аться ётся         осаться
SFX 46   аться ётесь        рваться
SFX 46   аться ётесь        осаться
SFX 46   аться ёмся         рваться
SFX 46   аться ёмся         осаться
SFX 46   ать  ут           рвать
SFX 46   ать  ут           осать
SFX 46   ать  у            рвать
SFX 46   ать  у            осать
SFX 46   ать  ят           спать
SFX 46   ать  лю           спать
SFX 46   ать  ишь          жать
SFX 46   ать  ишь          спать
SFX 46   ать  ите          жать
SFX 46   ать  ите          спать
SFX 46   ать  ит           жать
SFX 46   ать  ит           спать
SFX 46   ать  им           жать
SFX 46   ать  им           спать
SFX 46   ать  ешь          рвать
SFX 46   ать  ешь          осать
SFX 46   ать  ете          рвать
SFX 46   ать  ете          осать
SFX 46   ать  ет           рвать
SFX 46   ать  ет           осать
SFX 46   ать  ем           рвать
SFX 46   ать  ем           осать
SFX 46   ать  ёшь          рвать
SFX 46   ать  ёшь          осать
SFX 46   ать  ёте          рвать
SFX 46   ать  ёте          осать
SFX 46   ать  ёт           рвать
SFX 46   ать  ёт           осать
SFX 46   ать  ём           рвать
SFX 46   ать  ём           осать

SFX 47 Y 4
SFX 47   0     rs         e
SFX 47   y     iers       [^aeiou]y
SFX 47   0     ers        [aeiou]y
SFX 47   0     ers        [^ey]

SFX 48 Y 4
SFX 48   ый   о            [лнртв]ый
SFX 48   ий   о            ький
SFX 48   ий   и            [цс]кий
SFX 48   ий   е            щий
